Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5001
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-5001 to 71-5004 shall be known and may be cited as the Compassion and Care for Medically Challenging Pregnancies Act.

Laws 2017, LB506, § 1.